District of Columbia statutes.
5-1404

Former duties of coroner; oaths; teaching; other duties.

(a)

The CME shall be responsible for all the medical functions formerly performed by the coroner in the District of Columbia consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The CME and such other medical examiners as may be appointed may administer oaths and affirmations and take affidavits in connection with the performance of their duties.

(b)

The CME, other medical examiners, medicolegal investigators and toxicologists as he or she may appoint, may be authorized by the CME to teach medical and law school classes, to conduct special classes for law enforcement personnel and to engage in other activities related to their work.

(c)

The CME shall inform the Registrar of Vital Records of all deaths of children 18 years of age or younger as soon as practicable, but in any event within 5 business days.

(d)

The CME, or his or her designee, shall attend all reviews of child deaths by the Child Fatality Review Committee. The CME shall coordinate with the Child Fatality Review Committee in its investigations of child deaths.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2905, 47 DCR 6308
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4619(a), 48 DCR 6981
1981 Ed., § 11-2303.
D.C. Law 14-28 added subsecs. (c) and (d).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 19(a) of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2905 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 19(a) of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 19(a) of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).